Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2817, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 374, O.S.L. 2022 (68 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 2817), is amended to read as follows:


Section 2817. A. All taxable personal property, except


intangible personal property, personal property exempt from ad


valorem taxation, personal property with a fair cash value of One


Thousand Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($1,750.00) or less, or


household personal property, shall be listed and assessed each year


at its fair cash value, estimated at the price it would bring at a


fair voluntary sale, as of January 1.



Req. No. 2255 Page 1


The fair cash value of household personal property shall be


valued at ten percent (10%) of the appraised value of the


improvement to the residential real property within which such


personal property is located as of January 1 each year. The


assessment of household personal property as provided by this


section may be altered by the taxpayer listing such property at its


actual fair cash value. For purposes of establishing the value of


household personal property, pursuant to the requirement of Section


of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution, the percentage of value


prescribed by this section for the household personal property shall


be presumed to constitute the fair cash value of the personal


property.


Stocks of goods, wares, and merchandise shall be assessed at the


value of the average amount on hand during the preceding year, or


the average amount on hand during the part of the preceding year the


stock of goods, wares, or merchandise was at its January 1 location.


Provided, persons primarily engaged in selling lumber and other


building materials including cement and concrete, except for home


centers classified under Industry No. 444110 of the North American


Industrial Industry Classification Systems System (NAICS) Manual,


shall be assessed at the average value of the inventory on hand as


of January 1 of each year and the value of the inventory on hand as


of December 31 of the same year.



Req. No. 2255 Page 2


B. All taxable real property shall be assessed annually as of


January 1, at its fair cash value, estimated at the price it would


bring at a fair voluntary sale for:


1. The highest and best use for which the property was actually


used during the preceding calendar year; or


2. The highest and best use for which the property was last


classified for use if not actually used during the preceding


calendar year.


When improvements upon residential real property are divided by


a taxing jurisdiction line, those improvements shall be valued and


assessed in the taxing jurisdiction in which the physical majority


of those improvements are located.


The Ad Valorem Division of the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall be


responsible for the promulgation of rules which shall be followed by


each county assessor of the state, for the purposes of providing for


the equitable use valuation of locally assessed real property in


this state. Agricultural land and nonresidential improvements


necessary or convenient for agricultural purposes shall be assessed


for ad valorem taxation based upon the highest and best use for


which the property was actually used, or was previously classified


for use, during the calendar year next preceding January 1 on which


the assessment is made.


C. The use value of agricultural land shall be based on the


income capitalization approach using cash rent. The rental income

Req. No. 2255 Page 3


shall be calculated using the direct capitalization method based


upon factors including, but not limited to:


1. Soil types, as depicted on soil maps published by the


Natural Resources Conservation Service of the United States


Department of Agriculture;


2. Soil productivity indices approved by the Ad Valorem


Division of the Tax Commission;


3. The specific agricultural purpose of the soil based on use


categories approved by the Ad Valorem Division of the Tax


Commission; and


4. A capitalization rate to be determined annually by the Ad


Valorem Division of the Tax Commission based on the sum of the


average first mortgage interest rate charged by the Federal Land


Bank for the immediately preceding five (5) years, weighted with the


prevailing rate or rates for additional loans or equity, and the


effective tax rate.


The final use value will be calculated using the soil


productivity indices and the agricultural use classification as


defined by rules promulgated by the State Board of Equalization.


This subsection shall not be construed in a manner which is


inconsistent with the duties, powers, and authority of the Board as


to valuation of the counties as fixed and defined by Section 21 of


Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.



Req. No. 2255 Page 4


However, in calculating the use value of buffer strips as


defined in Section 2817.2 of this title, exclusive consideration


shall be based only on income from production agriculture from such


buffer strips, not including federal or state subsidies, when valued


as required by subsection C of Section 2817.2 of this title.


D. The use value of nonresidential improvements on agricultural


land shall be based on the cost approach to value estimation using


currently updated cost manuals published by the Marshall and Swift


Company or similar cost manuals approved by the Ad Valorem Division


of the Tax Commission. The use value estimates for the


nonresidential improvements shall take obsolescence and depreciation


into consideration in addition to necessary adjustments for local


variations in the cost of labor and materials. This section shall


not be construed in a manner which is inconsistent with the duties,


powers, and authority of the Board as to equalization of valuation


of the counties as determined and defined by Section 21 of Article X


of the Oklahoma Constitution.


The use value of facilities used for poultry production shall be


determined according to the following procedures:


1. The Ad Valorem Division of the Tax Commission is hereby


directed to develop a standard system of valuation of both real and


personal property of such facilities, which shall be used by all


county assessors in this state, under which valuation based on the



Req. No. 2255 Page 5


following shall be presumed to be the fair cash value of the


property:


a. for real property, a ten-year depreciation schedule,


at the end of which the residual value is twenty


percent (20%) of the value of the facility during its


first year of operation, and


b. for personal property, a five-year depreciation


schedule, at the end of which the residual value is


zero;


2. Such facilities shall be valued only in comparison to other


facilities used exclusively for poultry production. Such a facility


which is no longer used for poultry production shall be deemed to


have no productive use;


3. During the first year such a facility is placed on the tax


rolls, its fair cash value shall be presumed to be the lesser of the


actual purchase price or the actual documented cost of construction;


and


4. For the purpose of determining the valuation of


nonresidential improvements used for poultry production, the


provisions of this subsection shall be applicable and such


improvements shall not be considered to be commercial property.


E. The value of investment in property used exclusively by an


oil refinery that is used wholly as a facility, device, or method


for the desulphurization of gasoline or diesel fuel as defined in

Req. No. 2255 Page 6


Section 2817.3 of this title shall not be included in the


capitalization used in the determination of fair market value of


such oil refinery if such property would qualify as exempt property


pursuant to Section 2902 of this title, whether or not an


application for such exemption is made by an otherwise qualifying


manufacturing concern owning the property described by Section


2817.3 of this title.


F. The use value of a lot in any platted addition or a


subdivision in a city, town, or county zoned for residential,


commercial, industrial, or other use shall be deemed to be the fair


cash value of the underlying tract of land platted, divided by the


number of lots contained in the platted addition or subdivision


until the lot shall have been conveyed to a bona fide purchaser or


the lot with building or buildings located thereon shall have been


occupied other than as a sales office by the owner thereof, or shall


have been leased, whichever event shall first occur. One who


purchases a lot for the purposes of constructing and selling a


building on such lot shall not be deemed to be a bona fide purchaser


for purposes of this section. However, if the lot is held for a


period longer than two (2) years before construction, then the


assessor may consider the lot to have been conveyed to a bona fide


purchaser. The cost of any land or improvements to any real


property required to be dedicated to public use including, but not


limited to, streets, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, storm or sanitary

Req. No. 2255 Page 7


sewers, utilities, detention or retention ponds, easements, parks,


or reserves shall not be utilized by the county assessor in the


valuation of any real property for assessment purposes.


G. The transfer of real property without a change in its use


classification shall not require a reassessment thereof based


exclusively upon the sale value of the property. However, if the


county assessor determines:


1. That by reason of the transfer of a property there is a


change in the actual use or classification of the property; or


2. That by reason of the amount of the sales consideration it


is obvious that the use classification prior to the transfer of the


property is not commensurate with and would not justify the amount


of the sales consideration of the property;


then the assessor shall, in either event, reassess the property for


the new use classification for which the property is being used, or,


the highest and best use classification for which the property may,


by reason of the transfer, be classified for use.


H. When the term “fair cash value” or the language “fair cash


value, estimated at the price it would bring at a fair voluntary


sale” is used in the Ad Valorem Tax Code, in connection with and in


relation to the assessment of real property, it is defined to mean


and shall be given the meaning ascribed and assigned to it in this


section and when the term or language is used in the Code in



Req. No. 2255 Page 8


connection with the assessment of personal property it shall be


given its ordinary or literal meaning.


I. Where any real property is zoned for a use by a proper


zoning authority, and the use of the property has not been changed,


the use and not zoning shall determine assessment. Any reassessment


required shall be effective January 1 following the change in use.


Taxable real property need not be listed annually with the county


assessor.


J. If any real property shall become taxable after January 1 of


any year, the county assessor shall assess the same and place it


upon the tax rolls for the next ensuing year. When any building is


constructed upon land after January 1 of any year, the value of the


building shall be added by the county assessor to the assessed


valuation of the land upon which the building is constructed at the


fair cash value thereof for the next ensuing year. However, after


the building has been completed it shall be deemed to have a value


for assessment purposes of the fair cash value of the materials used


in such building only, until the building and the land on which the


building is located shall have been conveyed to a bona fide


purchaser or shall have been occupied or used for any purpose other


than as a sales office by the owner thereof, or shall have been


leased, whichever event shall first occur. The county assessor


shall continue to assess the building based upon the fair market


value of the materials used therein until the building and land upon

Req. No. 2255 Page 9


which the building is located shall have been conveyed to a bona


fide purchaser or is occupied or used for any purpose other than as


a sales office by the owner thereof, or is leased, whichever event


shall first occur.


K. In the event improvements on land or personal property


located therein or thereon are destroyed or partially destroyed, or


the land itself is impaired or partially impaired by fire,


lightning, storm, winds, floodwaters, overflow of streams, or other


cause (all such destruction or impairments being referred to herein


as “damage”) during any year, the county assessor shall determine


the amount of damage and shall reassess the property for that year


at the fair cash value of the property, taking into account the


actual loss of functional use of the property occasioned by such


damage. The assessor shall make the appropriate value adjustments


to the property for that tax year up to the time at which the


assessor publishes the “Assessor’s Report to the Excise Board” as


required by subsection D of Section 2867 of this title. After such


time, adjustments can be made only by the county board of tax roll


corrections and only after the assessor has certified the tax roll


for that year. The board secretary shall notify property owners in


advance of the time and place at which the value adjustment to their


property will be heard by the board. The board of tax roll


corrections is authorized only to approve or reject the value


adjustment submitted by the county assessor.

Req. No. 2255 Page 10


L. All taxable personal property used in the exploration of


oil, natural gas, or other minerals including drilling equipment and


rigs, shall be assessed annually at the value set forth in the first


Hadco International monthly bulletin published for the tax year,


using the appropriate depth rating assigned to the drawworks by its


manufacturer and the actual condition of the rig.


M. The value of taxable tangible personal property used in


commercial disposal systems of waste materials from the production


of oil and gas shall not include any contract rights or leases for


the use of such systems nor any value associated with the wellbore


or non-recoverable down-hole material including casing.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.




60-2-2255 QD 12/2/2025 10:38:57 PM





















Req. No. 2255 Page 11